Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4115.01
State DNA Sample and Database Fund; created; use; investment.

The State DNA Sample and Database Fund is created. The fund shall be maintained by the Nebraska State Patrol and administered by the Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety. The fund shall consist of any funds transferred to the fund by the Legislature or made available by any department or agency of the United States Government if so directed by such department or agency. The fund shall be used to pay the expenses of the Department of Correctional Services and the Nebraska State Patrol as needed to collect DNA samples as provided in section 29-4106. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 2010, LB190, § 6;

Laws 2017, LB331, § 21.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.